apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>          ! Noun
%<np%>          ! Proper noun
%<adj%>
%<adv%>
%<post%>       ! Postposition
%<cnjcoo%>     ! Co-ordinating conjunction  
%<cnjadv%>
%<cnjsub%>
%<ij%>        ! Interjection               ! 
%<num%>
%<prn%>
%<det%>       ! Determiner                 ! Детерминатив
%<abbr%>
%<postadv%>   ! Postadverb
%<cop%>       ! Copula                     ! Копула

! %<px1sg%>            ! redefined in Possessives
! %<px3sp%>            ! redefined in Possessives

! Cases ! "Case is a lie!" (quot.)

%<nom%>            
%<gen%>            
%<dat%>            
%<acc%>            
%<abl%>            
%<loc%>            
%<ins%>            ! Instrumental=comitative 

!! some additional ~cases
%<sim%>       ! Similative
              !# DAй
%<abe%>       ! Abessive=Privative ! Лишительный
              !# SIZ (not used after posessives and cases)
%<reas%>      ! not used rigth now, just in case for
              !# LIKTAN

! Possessives
%<px1sg%>     ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>     ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>     ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>     ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>     ! Second person plural
%<px3pl%>     ! Third person plural (for reflexive)
!%<px%>        ! General possessive          !# -нікі  ! now gen.subst

!!!!!! MISC!!!!

%<top%> ! TOPONYMS
%<al%> ! ALTER
%<ant%>       ! Anthroponym
%<cog%>       ! Cognomen     ! Фамилия
%<org%>

%<m%> ! 
%<f%> !
%<mf%> !

%<v%>
%<iv%>
%<tv%>
%<ger5%>
%<pcont%>
%<pcond%>
%<evid%>
%<kan%>
%<imp%>
%<perm%>
%<inf%>
%<gna1%>
%<gna2%>
%<gna3%>
%<gna4%>
%<pass%>

!! Tense / finite forms
%<pres%>      ! for "жатыр", "тұр", "отыр" and "жүр"
%<aor%>       ! -{E}
%<past%>      ! -{G}{A}н
%<ifi%>       ! -{D}{I}
%<ifi_evid%>  ! -{I}пт{I}
%<fut%>       ! -{I}р
%<fut_plan%>  ! -{M}{A}{K}
%<pih%>       ! -{E}тін       ! ~past imperfect ~"used to"

%<attr%>
%<subst%>
%<advl%>      ! Adverbial

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>
%<frm%>       ! Formality

! Modal particles
%<qst%>       ! Modal question particle
              !# m{A}
%<emph%>      ! Emphasizing modal particle
              !# -шы/-ші
%<mod_ass%>   ! Assertive modal particle
              !# -ғой/-қой
%<mod%>       ! Other modal words (шығар, сияқты etc)

%<unk%>       ! For foreign tokens

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<prn%>
%<adv%>
! %<ref%>
%<pers%>
! %<dem%>

!! Pronoun&Determiner types
%<dem%>       ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>       ! Indefinite
%<itg%>       ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>       ! Quantifier
%<neg%>       ! Negative       !# ешкім
              ! (NOTE: also used to denote negation in verbs, i.e for м{A})
%<ref%>       ! Reflexive

! Numeral types
%<ord%>       ! Ordinal
%<coll%>      ! Collective
%<dist%>      ! Distributive

!!! Gerunds (verbal nouns)
%<ger%>       ! -{U}
%<ger_past%>  ! -{G}{A}н
%<ger_perf%>  ! -{G}{A}нл{I}{K}   (stresses the fact that something happened)
%<ger_ppot%>  ! -{A}рл{I}{K}      (~the ability to do the denoted action)
              !# "_Сүйсінерлігі_ сол, өз сеніміне берік те адал халқымыз дінін
              !# сатпады, өзгенің тәтті де сылдыр сөзіне ермеді...";
%<ger_abs%>   ! -уш{I}л{I}{K}          FIXME CHECK
%<ger_fut%>   ! -{A}р
              !# "Мен айтарымды айттым";
%<ger_impf%>  ! -{E}{T}{I}н
              !# "Ол бүгін кешкілік болатынын айтты";
! TODO cover -{E}{T}{I}нд{I}{K} form

!! Transitivity
%<tv%>
%<iv%>

!!!! PUNCTUATION !!!

%<percent%>   ! Percent
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

!!!! JAWOHL TWOL!!!!

%{s%}		   ! Becomes "s" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{i%}		   ! Becomes as "i" after a consonant, otherwise null
%{E%}		   ! Becomes as "a" after a consonant, otherwise "y"	
%{K%}

! Archiphonemes and escaped symbols (from apertium-kaz) ! "FIXME"

%{L%}         ! Archiphoneme 'l': realised as л, д, т
%{N%}         ! Archiphoneme 'n': realised as н, д, т
%{M%}         ! Archiphoneme 'm': realised as м, б, п
%{G%}         ! Archiphoneme 'g': realised as к, қ, г, ғ
%{G%}         ! Archiphoneme 'k': realised as к, қ  >>>FIXME ???<<<
%{D%}         ! Archiphoneme 'd': realised as д, т
%{A%}         ! Archiphoneme 'a': realsied as е, а
%{I%}         ! Archiphoneme 'i': realised as і, ы
%{S%}         ! Realised as 'с' or ''; only used in 3rd person morphology
%{K%}         ! Realised as 'к' or 'қ'
%{n%}         ! Realised as 'н' or '';
              ! only used in 3rd person morphology and -NIKI
%{l%}         ! Realised as 'л' or 'н'; only used in passive -{I}{l}
%{y%}         ! Realised as '' or '{I}'; only used in epenthesis for nouns
%{o%}         ! Realised as ''; triggers dialectal interpretation of Iп
%{E%}         ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'й' (={A}/й)
%{д%}         ! Realised as д before vowels, 0 otherwise
%{т%}         ! Realised as т before vowels, 0 otherwise


%{а%}         ! Archiphoneme for back vowel numerals/abbreviation
%{э%}         ! Archiphoneme for front vowel numerals/abbreviation
%{ә%}         ! Surfaces as ә, but:
              ! triggers front harmony for {I} and back harmony for {A}

%{й%}         !
%{л%}         !
%{н%}         !
%{з%}         !
%{т%}         !
%{с%}         !

%{☭%}         ! Used to tell the phonology about a Russian word
%{і%}         !

%{❗%}         ! Obstacles on the road!!!
%{ъ%}         ! Force back harmony

%>            ! Morpheme boundary
%,            !
%.            !
%             ! Space
%-            !
%%            !

%>

%'
%`
%ʻ
%  


LEXICON Root

ModalParticles ;
Copula ;
Nouns ; 
Postpositions ; 
Adjectives ; 
Determinatives ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Verbs ; 
Adverbs ;
Numerals ; 
Punctuation ;
Titles ;
Digits ; 
Pronouns ; 
Interjections ; 
Qst-pron ; 
Mistakes ;
Postadverbs ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!	CONJUNCTIONS, CAUSE EVEN SENTENCES AND WORDS WANNA BE TOGETHER !!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ning # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:nga # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ni # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:nuki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ndagi CASE ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<com%>:nunla # ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:nu%{pN%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nlar CASE-ETC ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:nları%{pN%} CASE ;



LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS 

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;


!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!

mi:mi QST ; ! "" 
ku:ku QST ; ! ""
chi:chi QST ; ! "" 
u:u QST ; ! "" 
yu:yu QST ; ! "" 
da:da QST ; ! "" 


LEXICON VERB-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: VERB-IV-FULL ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>:il VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<ref%>:in VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:ma VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>%<neg%>:ilma VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<ref%>%<neg%>:inma VERB-IV-FULL ;


LEXICON VERB-IV-FULL

GERUND ;
PRES-CONT ;
PRES-COND ;
AORIST ;
INDEF-PAST ; 
PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
NON-FINITE ;
PERMISSIVE ;
IMPERATIVE ;



!!!!!!!COPULA SUFFIXES!!!!!!



LEXICON VERB-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:il VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<neg%>:ilma VERB-TV-FULL ;

%<v%>%<tv%>%<ref%>:in VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<ref%>%<neg%>:inma VERB-TV-FULL ;

%<neg%>:ma VERB-TV-FULL ; 


%<v%>%<tv%>: VERB-TV-FULL ;


LEXICON VERB-TV-FULL

GERUND ;
PRES-CONT ;
PRES-COND ;
AORIST ;
INDEF-PAST ;
PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
NON-FINITE ;
PERMISSIVE ;
IMPERATIVE ;

LEXICON Verbs
parchala:parchala VERB-TV ; ! "to break into piece"
o%'ra:o%'ra VERB-TV ; ! "to wrap"
tayinlan:tayinlan VERB-IV ; ! "to be appointed"
qurdir:qurdir VERB-TV ; ! "allow to build"
chegaralan:chegaralan VERB-IV ; ! "to border"
tikla:tikla VERB-TV ; ! "to set up straight"
qoldir:qoldir VERB-TV ; ! "to leave"
o%'zgar:o%'zgar VERB-IV ; ! "to change"
o%'t:o%'t VERB-TV ; ! "to pass"
ta%'minlan:ta%'minlan VERB-IV ; ! "to be supplied"
chiz:chiz VERB-TV ; ! "to draw"
markazlash:markazlash VERB-IV ; ! "to become centralized"
ek:ek VERB-TV ; ! "to plant"
imzolan:imzolan VERB-IV ; ! "to be signed"
yoy:yoy VERB-TV ; ! "to spread out"
quy:quy VERB-TV ; ! "to pour"
zaryadlan:zaryadlan VERB-IV ; ! "to be charged"
kengay:kengay VERB-IV ; ! "to widen"
kechir:kechir VERB-TV ; ! "to experience"
boqil:boqil VERB-IV ; ! "to be looked after"
sana:sana VERB-TV ; ! "to count"
qurollan:qurollan VERB-IV ; ! "to take up arms" ****i dont know turkish equVERB-IValent
yetishtiril VERB-IV ; ! "to be trained"
taqiqlan:taqiqlan VERB-IV ; ! "to be prohibited"
pish:pish VERB-IV ; ! "to cook"
cheklan:cheklan VERB-IV ; ! "to be limited"
uch:uch VERB-IV ; ! "to fly"
to%'plan:to%'plan VERB-IV ; ! "to come together"
tashlash:tashlash VERB-TV ; ! "(coop. of) to throw"
tushir:tushir VERB-TV ; ! "to drop"
sug%'ur:sug%'ur VERB-TV ; ! "pull out"
bo%'l:bo%'l VERB-IV ; ! "be"
yoz:yoz VERB-TV ; ! "write"
tarqal:tarqalgan VERB-TV ; ! "spread"
mukofotlan:mukofotlan VERB-IV ; ! "to be rewarded"
qayt:qayt VERB-IV ; ! "to reach"
yoz:yoz VERB-TV ; ! "to write"
b%'ol:b%'ol VERB-IV ; ! "to be"
qo%'zg%'al:qo%'zg%'al VERB-IV ; ! "to rebel"
urgu%ber:urgu%ber VERB-TV ; ! "to emphasize"
olib% kel VERB-TV ; ! "to bring"
tush:tush VERB-IV ; ! "to fall"
o%'rgan:o%'rgan VERB-TV ; ! "to learn"
zaharla:zaharla VERB-TV ; ! "to poison"
ko%'taril:ko%'taril VERB-IV ; ! "to rise up"
tozala:tozala VERB-TV ; ! "to clean"
so%'ra:so%'ra VERB-TV ; ! "to ask"
og:og VERB-IV ; ! "to deviate"
sogin:sogin VERB-TV ; ! "to miss"
ket:ket VERB-IV ; ! " to go"
boshla:boshla VERB-TV ; ! "start"
ishla:ishla VERB-IV ; ! "to work, function"
tog%':tog%' VERB-TV ; ! "to give birth"
olin:olin VERB-IV ; ! "to be taken" 
lat:lat VERB-TV ; ! ""
kamay:kamay VERB-IV ; ! "decrease"
xursand% bo%'l:xursand% bo%'l VERB-IV ; ! "be happy"
LEXICON Conjunctions 
deb:deb CS ; ! "because"
ila:ila CC ; ! "with"
hamda:hamda CC ; ! "also"
toki:toki CC ; ! " so that"
nima:nima CC ; ! ""
va:va CC ; ! "and"
esa:esa CC ; ! "whereas"
ham:ham CC ; ! "and.. and" "too"
va:va CC ; ! "and"
faqat:faqat CC ; ! "but"
ammo:ammo CC ; ! "but"
biroq: biroq CC ; ! "but"
bilan:bilan CC ; ! "and"
yoki:yoki CC ; ! "or"
yoki:yoki CC ; ! "or"
ham:ham CC ; ! "too"
na% na:na% na CC ; ! "neither/nor"
chunki:chunki CC ; ! "because"
ham:ham CC ; ! "both/also"
lekin:lekin CC ; ! "but/however"
yoki:yoki CC ; ! "or/ese"
goh:goh CC ; ! "at times"
ki:ki CS ; ! "that"
sababli:sababli CS ; ! "for/so that"
kabi:kabi CS ; ! "such as/like"
agar:agar CS ; ! "if"
agarda:agarda CS ; ! "if"
shoyad:shoyad CS ; ! "if/if only"
sababli:sababli CS ; ! "due to/because"
hech% bo%'lmasa:hech% bo%'lmasa CA ; ! "at least"
balki:balki CA ; ! "maybe"
biroq:biroq CA ; ! "only if"
hatto:hatto CA ; ! "even"
bundan% tashqari:bundan% tashqari CA ; ! "moreover"
faqat:faqat CA ; ! "but"
mana:mana CA ; ! "here is"
shuningdek:shuningdek CA ; ! "likewise"
tezda:tezda CA ; ! "briefly"
magar:magar CA ; ! "to this surprise"
qandaydir:qandaydir CA ; ! "somehow"
bo%'lsin:bo%'lsin CA ; ! "may it be so"
u% holda:u% holda CA ; ! "then/in that case"
holbuki:holbuki CA ; ! "yet"
so%'ngra:so%'ngra CA ; ! "afterwards"
aksincha:aksincha CA ; ! "on the contrary"
yoki:yoki CA ; ! "or"
yo:yo CA ; ! "either...or"
ya%'ni:ya%'ni CA ; ! "in other words"
zora:zora CA ; ! "because/by the reason that"
u% holda:u% holda CA ; ! "then/in that case"
yoki:yoki CA ; ! "or"
yo%'qsa:yo%'qsa CA ; ! "otherwise"
aks% xolda:aks% xolda CA ; ! "otherwise"
boshqacha% aytganda:boshqacha% aytganda CA ; ! ""
yozishicha:yozishicha CA ; ! ""
shu% sababdan:shu% sababdan CA ; ! ""
shuning% uchun:shuning% uchun CA ; ! ""
xabaricha:xabaricha CA ; ! ""
tushunishi% bo%'yicha:tushunishi% bo%'yicha CA ; ! ""
